Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20182-3988
Milk utensils;
sanitation requirements.

At a facility producing
milk for manufacturing purposes, utensils, milk cans, milking machines, including
pipeline systems, and other equipment used in the handling of milk shall be
maintained in good condition, shall be free from rust, open seams, milkstone,
or any unsanitary condition, and shall be washed, rinsed, and drained after
each milking, stored in suitable facilities, and sanitized immediately before
use. New or replacement can lids shall be umbrella type. All new utensils,
new farm bulk tanks, and equipment shall meet 3-A Sanitary Standards and comply with applicable
rules and regulations of the department. Equipment
manufactured in conformity with 3-A Sanitary Standards complies with the sanitary
design and construction standards of the Nebraska Milk Act.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 14, p. 76;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.100;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 24;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 20;

Laws 1993, LB 268, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 198, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 2-3924;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 24;

Laws 2013, LB67, § 11.